Utah statutes.
32B-2-305.   Alcoholic Beverage Control Act Enforcement Fund.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Alcohol-related law enforcement officer" is as defined in Section 32B-1-201.

(b)  "Enforcement ratio" is as defined in Section 32B-1-201.

(c)  "Fund" means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act Enforcement Fund created in this section.

(2)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Alcoholic Beverage Control Act Enforcement Fund."

(3) (a)  The fund consists of:

(i)  deposits made under Subsection (4); and

(ii)  interest earned on the fund.

(b)  The fund shall earn interest.  Interest on the fund shall be deposited into the fund.

(4)  After the deposit made under Section 32B-2-304 for the school lunch program, the department shall deposit 1% of the total gross revenue from the sale of liquor with the state treasurer to be credited to the fund to be used by the Department of Public Safety as provided in Subsection (5).

(5)  The Department of Public Safety shall expend money from the fund to supplement appropriations by the Legislature so that the Department of Public Safety maintains a sufficient number of alcohol-related law enforcement officers such that beginning on July 1, 2012, each year the enforcement ratio as of July 1 is equal to or less than the number specified in Section 32B-1-201.

